District of Columbia statutes.
28-4002

Powers and duties of the Office of Consumer Protection.

The Office shall:

(1)

issue and renew certificates of registration to engage in the business of fitting and selling of hearing aids, as provided in section 28-4003; and

(2)

implement and enforce the provisions of this chapter by utilizing the powers, procedures and sanctions of the Office, as provided for in sections 28-3903 and 28-3905 of the “District of Columbia Consumer Protection Procedures Act”, approved July 22, 1976 (D.C. Law 1-76) [D.C. Official Code, §§ 28-3903 and 28-3905] and the regulations of the Office.

Oct. 26, 1977, D.C. Law 2-33, § 3, 24 DCR 3726
enacted, Sept. 6, 1980, D.C. Law 3-85, § 3(b), (e), 27 DCR 2900
1981 Ed., § 28-4002.
1973 Ed., T. 28, Appx., § 53.